New Jersey, session 221, A2982.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   A cable television company shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number that may be used by its customers to report CATV service outages, to receive updates concerning the status of CATV service outages, and to receive information concerning the resumption of CATV service, which shall include, but not be limited to, an estimated time of CATV service restoration. b.    A cable television company shall publish the toll-free telephone number required, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, with an explanation of the purpose of the toll-free telephone number, on every periodic bill sent to each customer of the cable television company and in a prominent location on the homepage of the cable television companys Internet website. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately but shall remain inoperative for 60 days following the date of enactment.